Washington statutes.
RCW 43.378.030

Limitations on distributions from the geothermal account.

Distribution of funds from the geothermal account created in RCW 43.378.020 shall be subject to the following limitations:

(1) Seventy percent to the department of natural resources for geothermal exploration and assessment; and

(2) Thirty percent to Washington State University or its statutory successor for the purpose of encouraging the development of geothermal energy.

[ 2013 c 274 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 c 274: See note following RCW 78.60.030.